Washington statutes.
RCW 39.26.150

Public notice—Posting on enterprise vendor registration and bid notification system.

(1) Agencies must provide public notice for all competitive solicitations. Agencies must post all contract opportunities on the state's enterprise vendor registration and bid notification system. In addition, agencies may notify contractors and potential bidders by sending notices by mail, electronic transmission, newspaper advertisements, or other means as may be appropriate.

(2) Agencies should try to anticipate changes in a requirement before the bid submittal date and to provide reasonable notice to all prospective bidders of any resulting modification or cancellation. If, in the opinion of the agency, it is not possible to provide reasonable notice, the submittal date for receipt of bids may be postponed and all bidders notified.

[ 2012 c 224 s 17.]